Wyoming statutes. Title 13 Banks, Banking and Finance
Article 4. Checking Accounts Disclosures

§ 13-1-401.
Definitions.

For purposes of this article:

“Consumer deposit account” means a demand or other similar deposit account established and maintained by a natural person with a financial institution and operated primarily for personal, family or household purposes;

“Financial institution” means any bank, savings and loan association, trust company or credit union having a place of business in Wyoming, whether chartered or organized under the laws of Wyoming or the laws of the United States. “Financial institution” includes a Wyoming branch of an out-of-state bank resulting from an interstate merger pursuant to article 8 of chapter 2 of this title.

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 61, § 1; 1997, ch. 75, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 13-1-402.
Disclosure of date when account opened; exception; penalty.

All checks, drafts or similar negotiable or nonnegotiable instruments or orders of withdrawal which are drawn against funds held by a financial institution located in Wyoming in a consumer deposit account shall, for a period of not less than twelve (12) months, clearly display on the face thereof the month and year in which the account was opened. This section does not apply to temporary checks, drafts or similar negotiable or nonnegotiable instruments or orders of withdrawal, or to a consumer deposit account where the applicant either demonstrates through the production of monthly statements or represents in a writing, certified under sworn oath or affirmation, that for twelve (12) months immediately preceding his application he has had an account at the same or another financial institution. A written representation made to avoid this section is subject to W.S.

6-5-303

.

No liability or penalty shall be imposed on any depositor, financial institution or printer for an unintentional failure to comply with this section.

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 61, § 1; 1988, ch. 59, § 1; 2010, ch. 69, § 203.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, in (a), deleted “opened after July 1, 1983” following “consumer deposit account,” and made related changes.

Editor's notes. —

As enacted, this section contained provisions designated as subsections (a) and (c). The provisions of subsection (c) have been redesignated to conform to normal statutory construction.